test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-kuarrud_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kuárruđ: # ML checked

    kuárruđ+V+Inf: kuárruđ
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: koorruđ
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koorruum
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: koorruuh
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuárroo
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kuárrojeen
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: koorruuvettee
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: koorruv
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: koorrup
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: koorruuvetteđ
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kuárrojeh
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kuárrojim
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kuárrojih
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: koorrui
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: koorruim
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: koorruid
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: koorruin
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: koorruim
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: koorruid
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kuárrojii
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: koorruuččim
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: koorruuččih
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: koorruuččij
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: koorruuččáim
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: koorruuččáid
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: koorruuččáin
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: koorruuččijm
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: koorruuččijd
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: koorruuččii
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: koorruužeem
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: koorruužeeh
#    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: kuáruš
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: koorruužeen
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: kuárušvettee
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: koorruužává
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: koorruužep
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: kuárušvetteđ
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: koorruužeh
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: koorruu
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: koorrum
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: kuáruuččii
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: koorruužii
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: kuárruee
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: koorrum
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: koorrum
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: koorruumin
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: koorruumist
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: koorruumân
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: koorruudijn
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: koorruuhánnáá
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuárudâm
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kuárudah
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuárud
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kuárudeen
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kuárudvettee
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kuárudává
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kuárudeh
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kuárud
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kuárudim
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kuárudij
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kuárudii
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: kuárudiččim
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: kuárudičij
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: kuárudižžeem
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: kuárudiš
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kuárud
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kuárudâm
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: kuárudižžii
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: kuárudâm
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: kuárudhennáá
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: kuárudhinnáá
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: kuárudhánnáá
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: kuárudem
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: kuárudmân
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: kuárudmin
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: kuárudmist
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com: kuáruddijn
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg1: kuáruddijnân
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg2: kuáruddijnâd
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg3: kuáruddijnis
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: kuáruddijn
    kuárruđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuárustâm
    kuárruđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuáruttâm
    kuárruđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuáruškuáđám
